Indiana, session 2026, SB279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 23-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 21. PRIVATE CREDIT FUNDS
Chapter 1. Applicability
Sec. 1. This article applies to investment information that is
delivered or communicated to an Indiana investor or the
commissioner after June 30, 2026.
Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 1. "Commissioner" means the securities commissioner
appointed under IC 23-19-6-1(a).
Sec. 2. "Deliver" or "delivery" means any method of delivery
used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by
hand, mail, commercial delivery, and electronic transmission.
Sec. 3. "Disclosure", with respect to a private credit fund,
means information that:
(1) is included in investment information; and
2026 IN 279—LS 7102/DI 101


(2) sets forth information as to terms, objectives, risks,
performance, investment strategy, management, fees, and
other information:
(A) related to the private credit fund; and
(B) necessary for investors or potential investors to make
informed investment decisions.
Sec. 4. "Fund manager" means a firm or organization that
manages a private credit fund.
Sec. 5. "Indiana investor", with respect to a private credit fund,
means:
(1) an individual investor whose principal residence is in
Indiana; or
(2) an institutional investor that is domiciled in Indiana.
Sec. 6. "Investment information" means:
(1) an investor report;
(2) a circular;
(3) a prospectus;
(4) marketing material; or
(5) any similar investment information or promotional
material;
that concerns a private credit fund.
Sec. 7. "Private credit fund" means a fund that:
(1) pools capital from investors to make loans directly to
private businesses, bypassing traditional financial institutions;
(2) earns income from:
(A) base interest rates;
(B) spread; and
(C) deal fees;
associated with the loans made;
(3) may not be available to the general investing public;
(4) may require investors to:
(A) be accredited or meet specified asset, income, net
worth, or professional criteria;
(B) make substantial minimum investments; or
(C) commit their capital over substantial minimum time
frames; and
(5) may make loans to borrowers that:
(A) have credit ratings that are below investment grade; or
(B) do not qualify for loans offered by financial
institutions.
Chapter 3. Disclosure Requirements
Sec. 1. (a) After June 30, 2026, the responsible party or fund
2026 IN 279—LS 7102/DI 101


manager for a private credit fund shall deliver to:
(1) an Indiana investor that has invested capital in the private
credit fund; and
(2) the commissioner;
an investor report on at least a quarterly basis. The responsible
party or fund manager shall deliver an investor report to the
commissioner in the manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(b) An investor report required under this section must include,
at a minimum, the following disclosures, current as of the end of
the quarter to which the report pertains:
(1) The following investment returns for the private credit
fund, reported both inclusive and exclusive of fees:
(A) One (1) month return.
(B) Three (3) month return.
(C) Rolling twelve (12) month return.
(D) Return since inception.
(2) The number of loans in the fund's portfolio.
(3) The number of loans with outstanding balances that
represent more than five percent (5%) of the portfolio's value.
(4) A summary of the geographic spread of the portfolio's
loans.
(5) The number of loans in arrears, broken down by the
number of months in arrears.
(6) The number of loans with payment-in-kind interest
arrangements, including the percentage of the portfolio's
value those loans represent.
(7) The range of interest rates applicable to loans in the
portfolio, including a breakdown of loans with fixed rates and
floating interest rates.
(8) The types and amounts of fees paid by borrowers in the
fund's loan portfolio, including:
(A) the percentage of those fees retained by the fund or
fund manager; and
(B) the percentage of those fees distributed to investors.
(9) The proportion of investor distributions paid from:
(A) cash income from investments, including interest
payments and fees paid by borrowers in the fund's loan
portfolio; and
(B) other sources.
(10) The level of fund gearing, including both fund-level
leverage and portfolio-level leverage, expressed as a:
(A) debt to equity ratio; or
2026 IN 279—LS 7102/DI 101


(B) percentage.
(11) The proportion of loans in the portfolio that are
unsecured, including an assessment of the associated risks.
(12) For the secured portion of the portfolio:
(A) the nature of the security or collateral; and
(B) the percentage of the portfolio's value the secured
portion represents.
(13) Default and loss statistics for the portfolio's loans,
including a definition of what constitutes default under the
terms of the loans.
(14) An identification of, and contact information for, the
fund manager, including:
(A) legal name;
(B) any trade name under which the fund manager does
business;
(C) principal business address; and
(D) telephone number.
Sec. 2. (a) Any investment information that is delivered or
communicated to an Indiana investor after June 30, 2026, may not
include language or terms that positively describe the risk profile
of a private credit fund unless:
(1) a disclaimer is provided; or
(2) the fund's assets are rated by an outside credit rating
agency.
(b) Any information included on a publicly accessible web page
maintained by the fund manager is subject to the restrictions set
forth in subsection (a).
Sec. 3. The responsible party or fund manager for a private
credit fund shall, upon the written request of an Indiana investor
or the commissioner, make available in writing the fund manager's
policies on the following:
(1) Valuation practices with respect to the fund's loans,
including the frequency of valuations.
(2) Liquidity management.
(3) Credit risk assessment, including the frequency of
assessments.
(4) Borrower default management.
(5) Conflicts of interest.
Chapter 4. Administration and Enforcement
Sec. 1. The commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement and administer this article.
Sec. 2. The commissioner may use any lawful means within the
2026 IN 279—LS 7102/DI 101


commissioner's authority to enforce this article.
Sec. 3. In connection with the administration and enforcement
of this article, the attorney general shall provide all necessary
assistance to the commissioner upon the commissioner's request.
Sec. 4. IC 4-21.5 and any rules of practice adopted by the
securities division are applicable to any administrative proceeding
arising out of the administration or enforcement of this article.
2026 IN 279—LS 7102/DI 101